New York, session 2025-2026, S3876.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 9, 10, 11 and 12 of section 349-d of the 2 general business law, subdivision 9 as amended by section 34 of part A 3 of chapter 62 of the laws of 2011 and subdivisions 10, 11 and 12 as 4 added by chapter 416 of the laws of 2010, are amended to read as 5 follows: 6 9. The first page of each billing statement from an ESCO delivered to 7 the customer, either by the ESCO directly or by a utility corporation, 8 by a municipality or by any other method, shall include a side-by-side 9 comparison showing both the price charged by the ESCO for commodity and 10 delivery service during the prior billing period, and the price the 11 customer would have paid had they taken commodity and delivery service 12 from their local utility corporation or municipality, as applicable. 13 Such statement shall also include, separately and apart from the price 14 charged by the ESCO for commodity and delivery service, an itemized list 15 of prices charged by the ESCO for any energy-related value-added 16 products provided by the ESCO during the prior billing period. 17 10. Every twelve months, an ESCO shall provide each of its customers 18 with a statement comparing the price charged by the ESCO for commodity 19 and delivery services and other energy-related value-added products over 20 the prior twelve-month period with the price such customer would have 21 paid had they taken commodity and delivery service from their local 22 utility corporation or municipality, as applicable, for such period. 23 Such statement shall convey such information in a manner that unambig- 24 uously conveys whether the customer is saving money or paying a premium 25 for service from the ESCO over such period. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07240-01-5 S. 3876 2 1 11. The attorney general, upon [his or her] their own motion or upon 2 referral from the public service commission, the Long Island power 3 authority or the department of state, may bring a civil action against 4 any energy services company that violates any provision of this section 5 and may recover (a) a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars 6 per violation; and (b) costs and reasonable attorney's fees. In any such 7 proceeding the court may direct restitution. 8 [10.] 12. In addition to the right of action granted to the attorney 9 general pursuant to this section, any person who has been injured by 10 reason of any violation of this section may bring an action in [his or 11 her] their own name to enjoin such unlawful act or practice, an action 12 to recover [his or her] their actual damages or five hundred dollars, 13 whichever is greater, or both such actions. The court may, in its 14 discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not to exceed 15 three times the actual damages up to ten thousand dollars, if the court 16 finds the defendant willfully or knowingly violated this section. The 17 court may award reasonable attorney's fees to a prevailing plaintiff. 18 [11.] 13. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit any author- 19 ity of the public service commission or the Long Island power authority, 20 which existed before the effective date of this section, to limit, 21 suspend or revoke the eligibility of an energy services company to sell 22 or offer for sale any energy services for violation of any provision of 23 law, rule, regulation or policy enforceable by such commission or 24 authority. 25 [12.] 14. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit any author- 26 ity of the public service commission or the Long Island power authority, 27 which existed before the effective date of this section, to adopt addi- 28 tional guidelines, practices, policies, rules or regulations relating to 29 the marketing practices of energy services companies to residential and 30 commercial customers, whether in person (including door to door), or by 31 mail, telephone or other electronic means, that are not inconsistent 32 with the provisions of this section. 33 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 34 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 35 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 36 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or 37 before such date.